Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB283.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 9 TLSB 2657YC (4) 91 jda/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 256.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 69. Publish on the departmentâs internet 3 site the number of certificates awarded to adjunct instructors 4 pursuant to section 279.87, broken down by school district, 5 attendance center, grade level in which the adjunct instructor 6 provides instruction, and the subject area in which the adjunct 7 instructor provides instruction. 8 Sec. 2. Section 256.146, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 9 following new subsection: 10 NEW SUBSECTION . 28. Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 11 that require the board of educational examiners to issue a 12 certificate to an adjunct instructor that allows the adjunct 13 instructor to provide instruction to students enrolled in a 14 school district in grades nine through twelve when directed 15 by the board of directors of the school district pursuant to 16 section 279.87, and to renew such a certificate when directed 17 by the board of directors of the school district pursuant to 18 section 279.87, unless the applicant for the certificate is 19 disqualified for any reason specified in subsection 13. 20 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 279.87 Adjunct instructors ââ 21 certificates. 22 1. As used in this section: 23 a. âAdjunct instructorâ means an individual who has attained 24 a minimum of a baccalaureate degree and who has expertise or 25 significant professional experience in a core subject area or 26 a noncore subject area. 27 b. âCore subjectâ means any of the following subject areas: 28 (1) English-language arts. 29 (2) Social studies. 30 (3) Mathematics. 31 (4) Science. 32 c. âNoncore subjectâ means any subject area that is not a 33 core subject. 34 d. âSupervising teacherâ means a teacher employed by a 35 -1- LSB 2657YC (4) 91 jda/jh 1/ 6 H.F. _____ school district who has at least three years of teaching 1 experience and who has received at least satisfactory 2 evaluations while employed by the school district as a teacher. 3 e. âTeacherâ means the same as defined in section 256.145. 4 2. a. The board of directors of a school district 5 may direct the board of educational examiners to award a 6 certificate to an adjunct instructor who is not disqualified 7 for any reason specified in section 256.146, subsection 13, 8 that allows the adjunct instructor to provide instruction to 9 students enrolled in grades nine through twelve, including 10 instruction provided in accordance with section 256.43, for 11 one school year on a full-time or part-time basis subject 12 to requirements established by the school district. The 13 requirements established by the school district must be 14 published on the school districtâs internet site and must 15 include all of the following: 16 (1) If the adjunct instructor applies to teach a core 17 subject, the adjunct instructor must demonstrate subject area 18 mastery of the core subject by passing a subject area test or 19 producing evidence of a related industry certification. 20 (2) If the adjunct instructor applies to teach a noncore 21 subject, the adjunct instructor must demonstrate subject area 22 mastery of the noncore subject by passing a subject area test, 23 producing evidence of a related industry certification, or 24 producing evidence of significant professional experience in 25 the noncore subject. 26 b. Prior to directing the board of educational examiners to 27 award a certificate to an adjunct instructor under paragraph 28 âaâ , the school district shall initiate a state criminal history 29 record check of the adjunct instructor through the division 30 of criminal investigation of the department of public safety, 31 submit the adjunct instructorâs fingerprints to the division 32 for submission to the federal bureau of investigation for a 33 national criminal history record check, and review the sex 34 offender registry information under section 692A.121 available 35 -2- LSB 2657YC (4) 91 jda/jh 2/ 6 H.F. _____ to the general public, the central registry for child abuse 1 information established under section 235A.14, and the central 2 registry for dependent adult abuse information established 3 under section 235B.5 for information regarding the adjunct 4 instructor. 5 3. The board of directors of a school district shall do all 6 of the following: 7 a. Assign a supervising teacher to oversee, mentor, and 8 evaluate the progress of an adjunct instructor providing 9 instruction pursuant to subsection 2, paragraph âaâ . 10 b. Annually evaluate the performance of each adjunct 11 instructor providing instruction pursuant to subsection 2, 12 paragraph âaâ . 13 c. Report annually to the director of the department of 14 education the number of certificates the board of educational 15 examiners awarded to adjunct instructors employed by the school 16 district, broken down by whether the adjunct instructor teaches 17 full time or part time, the grade level in which the adjunct 18 instructor provides instruction, and the subject area in which 19 the adjunct instructor provides instruction. 20 4. a. If the board of directors of a school district 21 determines that an adjunct instructor providing instruction 22 pursuant to subsection 2, paragraph âaâ , in a core subject has 23 performed effectively in providing instruction to students, 24 the board of directors of the school district may direct 25 the board of educational examiners to renew the adjunct 26 instructorâs certificate for the immediately subsequent school 27 year; provided, however, that an adjunct instructor shall not 28 provide instruction to students in a core subject for more than 29 three consecutive or nonconsecutive school years pursuant to a 30 certificate awarded under subsection 2, paragraph âaâ . 31 b. If the board of directors of a school district determines 32 that an adjunct instructor providing instruction pursuant to 33 subsection 2, paragraph âaâ , in a noncore subject has performed 34 effectively in providing instruction to students, the board 35 -3- LSB 2657YC (4) 91 jda/jh 3/ 6 H.F. _____ of directors of the school district may direct the board 1 of educational examiners to renew the adjunct instructorâs 2 certificate for the immediately subsequent school year. 3 5. This section shall not be construed to prohibit an 4 adjunct instructor who is providing instruction pursuant to 5 subsection 2, paragraph âaâ , from applying for and seeking 6 any license, certificate, authorization, or statement of 7 recognition issued by the board of educational examiners, 8 including during the time in which the adjunct instructor is 9 providing instruction under this section. 10 6. The rights available to a teacher under sections 279.15, 11 279.16, 279.18, and 279.27 apply to an adjunct instructor 12 providing instruction pursuant to subsection 2, paragraph âaâ . 13